Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1195.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of economic security; legal assistance services aid; annual report; exemption; intent A. The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of economic security to support the coordination and delivery of free, statewide general civil legal assistance services that are provided by nonprofit organizations consistent with the 2025 grant terms and conditions of the legal assistance services corporation as authorized pursuant to 42 United States Code section 2996f. B. On or before August 15, 2027 through December 31, 2032, the department of economic security shall submit a report on the status of legal assistance provided with the appropriation made in subsection A of this section for the preceding twelve months to the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. The report shall include statistical data regarding: 1. The number of cases opened and closed. 2. The areas of law the cases concern. 3. The services provided. 4. General non-identifying demographic information related to the persons who received assistance pursuant to this section. C. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. D. The legislature intends that the appropriation made in subsection A of this section be considered ongoing funding in fiscal years.